Utah statutes.
35A-1-108.   Participants in work experience or training programs funded by
the department -- Status -- Receipt of workers' compensation medical benefits.
(1)  A client or applicant who is directed to participate in a work experience
or training program funded by the department is considered to be a volunteer
government worker of the department, as provided in Title 67, Chapter 20,
Volunteer Government Workers Act, solely for the purpose of receiving workers'
compensation medical benefits.
(2)  Receipt of medical benefits by a client or applicant under Subsection (1)
is the exclusive remedy against the agency and the cooperating employer for
all injuries and occupational diseases as provided under Title 34A, Chapter 2,
Workers' Compensation Act, and Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act.
